Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB345.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definition of "campus police" in section 2001-A of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, amended July 17, 2024 (P.L.945, No.89), is amended to read:Section 2001-A. Definitions.--The following words and phrases when used in this article shall, for the purpose of this article, have the following meanings, respectively, except in those instances where the context clearly indicates a different meaning:* * *"Campus police" shall mean all law enforcement personnel employed by the system who [have successfully completed a campus 123456789101112131415161718192021 police course of training approved] are certified as police officers under 53 Pa.C.S. Ch. 21 Subch. D (relating to municipal police education and training).* * *Section 2. Section 2009-A(13) of the act is amended to read:Section 2009-A. Powers and Duties of Councils of Trustees.--(a) In accordance with policies, procedures and standards adopted by the board, the council of each institution shall have the power and its duty shall be:* * *[(13) By resolution adopted by the council to authorize campus police who have completed firearms training in accordance with 53 Pa.C.S. § 2167(a) (relating to police training) to carry firearms in the course of duty for any institution whose campus police are authorized to carry firearms on the effective date of this paragraph, the authority to carry firearms shall remain in effect unless the council by resolution dissolves such authority.]* * *Section 3. A resolution adopted by a council of trustees of an institution within the State System of Higher Education under section 2009-A(13) of the act that authorizes campus police to carry firearms shall be void and of no effect as of the effective date of this section.Section 4. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0345PN0300 - 2 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425